Hawaii statutes.
§205-18 Periodic review of districts.
The office of planning shall undertake a review of the classification and
districting of all lands in the State, within five years from December 31,
1985, and every fifth year thereafter. The office, in its five-year boundary
review, shall focus its efforts on reviewing the Hawaii state plan, county
general plans, and county development and community plans. Upon completion of
the five- year boundary review, the office shall submit a report of the
findings to the commission. The office may initiate state land use boundary
amendments which it deems appropriate to conform to these plans. The office
may seek assistance of appropriate state and county agencies and may employ
consultants and undertake studies in making this review. [L 1985, c 230, §2; am
L 1987, c 336, §7; am L 1988, c 352, §3; am L 1996, c 299, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next